nursery/apertium-tuk-tur/apertium-tuk-tur.tur.lexc
!
!LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_IR
!%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}t VINFL-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
!
LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_AR
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}t VINFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{bI%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>t VINFL-COMMON ;
!
!!! TV BELOW
!
!LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_AR
!
!%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
!%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>t VINFL-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR
! aç<t><tv><aor_ar>
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_AR-AOR_IR
! kulluk e<t><tv><caus_ar>
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{bI%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{A%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_AR-AOR_AR
! gi<t><tv><caus_ar><aor_ar> 
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{A%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_ART-AOR_AR
! çık<tv><caus_art><aor_ar>
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{A%}rt VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR
! al<tv><caus_dir>
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{bI%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR  
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_IRREG-AOR_AR
! IRREG does not get causative
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_IR
! üş<tv><caus_it>
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{bI%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}t VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_AR
! ak<tv><caus_it><aor_ar>
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}t VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR
! bekle<tv><caus_t>
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{bI%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>t VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;



LEXICON INTERJ

%<ij%>: # ;


LEXICON POST

%<post%>: # ;

LEXICON CC

%<cnjcoo%>: # ; 

LEXICON CS

%<cnjsub%>: # ; 

LEXICON CA

%<cnjadv%>: # ; 

LEXICON Verbs
et:e%{t%} VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "make"
iç:iç VTVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! "drink"
kabul% et:kabul% e%{t%} VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "admit, acknowledge"
oku:oku VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "read"
söyle:söyle VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "say"
yap:yap VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "do, make"
çık:çık VTVINFL-CAUS_ART-AOR_AR ; ! ""
del:del VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
geç:geç VTVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
kaç:kaç VTVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
kur:kur VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
ye:y%{e%} VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
çık:çık VTVINFL-CAUS_ART-AOR_AR ; ! ""
düşün:düşün VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
gizle:gizle VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
kullan:kullan VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "use"
kur:kur VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "set"
öğret:öğret VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "teach"
oku:oku VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "read"
onar:onar VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "repair"
önle:önle VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "prevent"
otur:otur VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "sit"
oyna:oyna VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "play"
sakla:sakla VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "hide"
say:say VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "count"
sev:sev VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "love"
seyret:seyre%{t%} VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "watch"
sor:sor VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "ask"
söyle:söyle VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "tell"
tak:tak VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "affix"
üret:üret VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "produce"
uyu:uyu VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "sleep"
ver:ver VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "give up"
yak:yak VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "burn"
yaz:yaz VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "write"
ye:ye VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "ear"
yükle:yükle VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "load"
yürü:yürü VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "walk"
al:al VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "take, buy"
ara:ar%{a%} VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "seek, search, look for"
bak:bak VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "look at"
bil:bil VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "know"
boya:boya VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "to paint"
bul:bul VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "find"
çiz:çiz VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "draw"
de:d%{e%} VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "say"
del:del VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "drill"
dinle:dinl%{e%} VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "listen"
düşün:düşün VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "think"
duy:duy VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "hear"
geç:geç VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "pass"
giy:giy VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "wear"
gizle:gizle VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "hide"
gör:gör VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "see"
gözle:gözle VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "watch"
iç:iç VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "drink"
ilerle:ilerle VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "proceed"
işaretle:işaretle VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "mark"
işit:işit VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "hear"
isle:isle VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "smoke"
iste:iste VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "want"
kazan:kazan VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "win"
bakın:bakın VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "??"
